South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S477.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 40-43-210(9) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (9) "Self-administered hormonal contraceptive" means a drug composed of a hormone or a combination of hormones that is approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration to prevent pregnancy and that the patient to whom the drug is prescribed or dispensed may administer to himselfherself.  "Self-administered hormonal contraceptive" includes an oral hormonal contraceptive, a hormonal vaginal ring, and a hormonal contraceptive patch.  "Self-administered hormonal contraceptive" does not include an intrauterine device or any drug intended to terminate a pregnancy. SECTION 2.  Section 40-43-230(A) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (A) A person licensed under the South Carolina Pharmacy Practice Act who is acting in good faith and exercising reasonable care as a pharmacist and who is employed by a hospital or a pharmacy that is permitted by this State may dispense a self-administered hormonal contraceptive or administer an injectable hormonal contraceptive pursuant to a standing order by a prescriber, or pursuant to the written joint protocols as required by this chapter, to a patient who is: (1) eighteen years of age or older; or (2) under eighteen years of age if the person has evidence of a previous prescription from a practitioner for a self-administered hormonal contraceptive or an injectable hormonal contraceptive. SECTION 3.  Section 40-43-240(A) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (A) The Board of Medical Examiners and the Board of Pharmacy must issue a written joint protocol to authorize a pharmacist to dispense a self-administered hormonal contraceptive or administer an injectable hormonal contraceptive without a patient-specific written orderunder a standing order or without a standing order when the contraceptive is being dispensed or administered pursuant to the written joint protocols as required by this chapter. SECTION 4.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. /s/Sen. Davis                                                        /s/Rep. Bernstein /s/Sen. Matthews                                                  /s/Rep. Calhoon /s/Sen. Garrett                                                      /s/Rep. Guest On Part of the Senate                                            On Part of the House ----XX----